Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
ARTICLE 2.5
COLORADO JUNK EMAIL LAW

6-2.5-101 to 6-2.5-105. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire article repealed, p. 596, § 3, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 2000 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 2008. For the text of this article prior to 2008, consult the 2007 Colorado Revised Statutes.

Cross references:

For the "Spam Reduction Act of 2008", see § 6-1-702.5.